Georgia statutes. TITLE 49 Social Services
CHAPTER 9 Georgia Vocational Rehabilitation Agency

Editor’s notes.

The former chapter consisted of Code Sections 49-9-1 through 49-9-42, relating to vocational rehabilitation services, and was based on Ga. L. 1951, p. 516, §§ 1, 3-15, 23; Ga. L. 1956, p. 52, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1956, p. 373, § 1; Ga. L. 1957, p. 274, § 1; Ga. L. 1959, p. 343, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1961, p. 400, § 1; Ga. L. 1964, p. 386, §§ 1-3; Ga. L. 1969, p. 944, § 1; Ga. L. 1971, p. 89, § 1; Ga. L. 1972, p. 1015, §§ 1212, 1216; Ga. L. 1978, p. 239, § 1; Ga. L. 1979, p. 132, § 5; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 49; Ga. L. 1982, p. 833, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1402, § 18; Ga. L. 1994, p. 97, § 49; Ga. L. 1995, p. 1302, §§ 12, 14, 16, and was repealed by Ga. L. 2000, p. 1137, § 12, effective July 1, 2001.